Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact
The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute;

The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.

Enforcement of the compact shall be as follows:

The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact;

By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees;

The remedies provided in this subsection shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

Article X Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment

This compact shall come into limited effect at the time the compact has been enacted into law in ten (10) party states for the sole purpose of establishing and convening the commission to adopt rules relating to its operation and the APRN uniform licensure requirements.

On the date of the commission’s adoption of the APRN uniform licensure requirements, all remaining provisions of this compact, and rules adopted by the commission, shall come into full force and effect in all party states.

Any state that joins this compact subsequent to the commission’s initial adoption of the APRN uniform licensure requirements shall be subject to all rules that have been previously adopted by the commission.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.

A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any APRN licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.

This compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any party state until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states.

Article XI Construction and Severability

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 10 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.